Utah statutes.
78B-6-1223.   Determination of adverse claims.

When the proceeds of the sale of any share or parcel belonging to persons who are parties to the action, and who are known or unknown, are paid into court, the action may continue between the parties for the determination of their respective claims.  Further evidence may be taken by the court or a referee at the discretion of the court, and the court may, if necessary, require the parties to present the facts or law in controversy by pleadings as in an original action.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

